Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.323

Hospital infection control grant account.

The hospital infection control grant account is created in the custody of the state treasury. All receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public or private sources to support its activities must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for awarding hospital infection control grants to hospitals and public agencies for establishing and maintaining hospital infection control and surveillance programs, for providing support for such programs, and for the administrative costs associated with the grant program. Only the secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2007 c 261 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2007 c 261: See note following RCW 43.70.056.